Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
PART 1 J EKYLL ISLAND-STATE PARK AUTHORITY
12-3-270. Use of rentals and other charges collected from leases and contracts for projects; obligations under lease contracts with authority; failure or refusal of lessee to perform; assignment of rentals due.

The authority is authorized to fix rentals and other charges which any department, board, commission, authority, or agency of the State of Georgia shall pay to the authority for the use of each project, or part thereof, or combination of projects. The authority is also authorized to charge and collect rentals and other charges and to lease and make contracts with any department, board, commission, authority, or agency of the State of Georgia with respect to the use by any institution or unit under its control of any project or part thereof. Such rentals and other charges shall be so fixed and adjusted in respect to the aggregate thereof from the project or projects for which a single issue of revenue bonds is issued as to provide a fund sufficient with other revenues of such project or projects, if any, to pay:

The cost of maintaining, repairing, and operating the project or projects, including reserves for extraordinary repairs and insurance and other reserves required by the resolution of trust indentures, unless such cost shall be otherwise provided for, which cost shall be deemed to include the expenses incurred by the authority on account of the project or projects for water, light, sewerage, and other services furnished by other facilities at such institution; and

The principal of the revenue bonds and the interest thereon as the same shall become due.

The rentals contracted to be paid by the state or any department, agency, or institution of the state to the authority under leases entered upon pursuant to this part shall constitute obligations of the state for the payment of which the good faith of the state is pledged. Such rentals shall be paid as provided in the lease contracts from funds appropriated for such purposes by the terms of the Constitution of Georgia. It shall be the duty of the state or any department, agency, or institution of the state to see to the punctual payment of all such rentals.

In the event of any failure or refusal on the part of the lessees punctually to perform any covenant or obligation contained in any lease entered upon pursuant to this part, the authority may enforce performance by any legal or equitable process against lessees, and consent is given for the institution of any such action.

The authority shall be permitted to assign any rental due it by the lessees to a trustee or paying agent as may be required by the terms of any trust indenture entered into by the authority.

(Ga. L. 1960, p. 89, § 1; Ga. L. 1964, p. 100, § 3.)

12-3-271. Utilization of income and revenues.

All income and revenues arising out of the operation of Jekyll Island State Park, and all gifts, grants, appropriations, or bond or loan proceeds made specifically for Jekyll Island State Park, shall be used by the authority for the sole purpose of beautifying, improving, developing, enlarging, maintaining, administering, managing, and promoting Jekyll Island State Park at the lowest rates reasonable and possible for the benefit of the people of the State of Georgia.

(Ga. L. 1950, p. 152, § 7; Ga. L. 1963, p. 391, § 5.)

12-3-272. Acceptance by authority of grants and contributions.

The authority, in addition to the moneys which may be received from the sale of revenue bonds and from the collection of revenues, rents, and earnings derived under this part, is authorized to accept from any federal agency grants for or in aid of the construction of any project or for the payment of bonds and to receive and accept contributions from any source of either money or property or other things of value to be held, used, and applied only for the purposes for which such grants or contributions may be made.

(Ga. L. 1950, p. 152, § 15; Ga. L. 1960, p. 89, § 1.)

12-3-273. Moneys received by authority as constituting trust funds.

All moneys received pursuant to the authority of this part, whether as proceeds from the sale of revenue bonds, as grants or other contributions, or as revenues, rents, and earnings, shall be deemed to be trust funds to be held and applied solely as provided in this part.

(Ga. L. 1960, p. 89, § 1.)

12-3-274. Authority property, activities, income, and bonds exempt from taxation and assessment.

It is found, determined, and declared that the creation of the authority and the carrying out of its corporate purpose are in all respects for the benefit of the people of this state and constitute a public purpose and that the authority will be performing an essential governmental function in the exercise of the power conferred upon it by this part. This state covenants with the holders of the bonds that the authority shall be required to pay no taxes or assessments upon any of the property acquired or leased by it, or under its jurisdiction, control, possession, or supervision, or upon its activities in the operation or maintenance of the buildings erected or acquired by it, or upon any fees, rentals, or other charges received by the authority for the use of such buildings, or upon other income received by the authority and that the authority shall be exempt from all sales and use taxes. Further, this state covenants that the bonds of the authority, their transfer, and the income therefrom shall at all times be exempt from all taxation within the state.

(Ga. L. 1950, p. 152, § 16; Ga. L. 1960, p. 89, § 1; Ga. L. 2007, p. 309, § 14/HB 219; Ga. L. 2007, p. 711, § 10/HB 214.)

Code Commission notes.

- The amendment of this Code section by Ga. L. 2007, p. 309,

§

14, irreconcilably conflicted with and was treated as superseded by Ga. L. 2007, p. 711,

§

10. See County of Butts v. Strahan,

151 Ga. 417

(1921).

12-3-275. Venue and jurisdiction for actions under part.

Any action to protect or enforce any rights under this part shall be brought in the Superior Court of Fulton County, Georgia, and any action pertaining to validation of any bonds issued under this part shall likewise be brought in such court, which shall have exclusive, original jurisdiction of such actions.

(Ga. L. 1950, p. 152, § 21; Ga. L. 1960, p. 89, § 1.)

Law reviews.

-
For note discussing problems with venue in Georgia, and proposing statutory revisions to improve the resolution of venue questions, see 9 Ga. St. B.J. 254 (1972).

12-3-276. Supplemental nature of part.

This part shall be deemed to provide an additional and alternative method for the doing of the things authorized thereby and shall be regarded as supplemental and additional to powers conferred by other laws and shall not be regarded as in derogation of any powers now existing.

(Ga. L. 1960, p. 89, § 1.)

12-3-277. Construction of part.

This part, being necessary for the welfare of the state and its inhabitants, shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes hereof.

(Ga. L. 1950, p. 152, § 23.)